Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-511
Clerk; powers; duties.

The clerk shall have the same power in the county court, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, as the clerk of the district court. The clerk shall keep and be the custodian of the records of the court. The clerk shall receive and account for all fees and money received by the court and shall deposit all money received pursuant to sections 77-2326.01 to 77-2326.09. Provisions for dockets and records of the county courts shall be established by rule of the Supreme Court.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 11;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 3;

Laws 1975, LB 286, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 14.

Amercement for neglect of duty, see section 25-1546.

Not to practice as an attorney, see section 7-111.

Oaths or affirmations, power to administer, see section 24-1002.

Power to take acknowledgments, see section 24-403.